Illinois, session 104th, SB3114.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Transparency in Downcoding Act. 6    Section 2. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Downcoding of medical claims, when done without 8    clear justification or transparency, undermines fair 9    payment of health care professionals and threatens the 10    stability of medical practices.11        (2) Improper downcoding may result in harm to patients 12    by disincentivizing care for individuals with complex 13    medical conditions.14        (3) It is in the public interest to ensure that all 15    coding adjustments are clinically supported, transparent, 16    appealable, and free from discriminatory targeting. 17    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:18    "CARC" means Claim Adjustment Reason Codes, which provide 19the reason for a financial adjustment specific to a particular 20claim or service referenced in the transmitted Accredited 21Standards Committee (ASC) X12 835 standard transaction adopted 22by the United States Department of Health and Human Services   SB3114 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1under 45 CFR 162.1602.2    "Downcoding" means the unilateral alteration by a health 3care payor of the level of evaluation and management service 4code or other service code submitted on a claim, resulting in a 5lower payment. "Downcoding" does not include the practice of 6addressing instances when providers submit multiple codes for 72 or more services that must be included in one group code 8pursuant to federal and State program integrity requirements. 9    "Excepted benefits" has the meaning given to that term in 1042 U.S.C. 300gg-91(c) and implementing regulations.11    "Group health plan" has the meaning given to that term in 12Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability and 13Accountability Act.14    "Group health plan sponsor" means the plan sponsor of a 15group health plan.16    "Health care payor" means a group health plan sponsor, 17health insurance issuer, or Medicaid managed care 18organization.19    "Health care professional" means a physician licensed to 20practice medicine in all its branches under the Medical 21Practice Act of 1987, a physician assistant licensed under the 22Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an advanced 23practice registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice 24Act.25    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning given to that 26term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability   SB3114 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1and Accountability Act.2    "Medicaid managed care organization" has the meaning given 3to the term "managed care organization" in Section 5H-1 of the 4Illinois Public Aid Code.5    "Plan sponsor" has the meaning given to that term in 29 6U.S.C. 1002(16)(B).7    "RARC" means Remittance Advice Remark Codes, which provide 8supplemental information about a financial adjustment 9indicated by a CARC or information about remittance 10processing. 11    Section 10. Applicability; scope. 12    (a) This Act applies to the following if they are issued, 13amended, delivered, or renewed on or after the effective date 14of this Act:15        (1) a policy or contract for health insurance coverage 16    as defined in the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 17    and Accountability Act; 18        (2) State, employee, county, municipality, or school 19    district group health plans; and20        (3) subject to federal law, rules, regulations, and 21    guidance, policies issued or delivered in this State to 22    the Department of Healthcare and Family Services and 23    providing coverage to persons who are enrolled under 24    Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code or under the 25    Children's Health Insurance Program Act. This Act does not   SB3114 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1    diminish the ability of the Department of Healthcare and 2    Family Services' Office of the Inspector General to 3    prevent, detect, and eliminate fraud, waste, abuse, 4    mismanagement, and misconduct.5    This Act does not apply to employee or employer 6self-insured health benefit plans under the federal Employee 7Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and health care 8provided pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act or the 9Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, and excepted benefits, 10including stand-alone dental plans.11    (b) This Act shall not diminish a health care payor's 12duties and responsibilities under other federal or State law 13or the rules adopted thereunder.14    (c) This Act is not intended to alter or impede the 15provisions of any consent decree or judicial order to which 16the State or any of its agencies is a party.17    (d) The regulation of downcoding of medical claims in 18policies issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after 19January 1, 2028 is an exclusive power and function of the 20State. A home rule unit may not regulate downcoding of medical 21claims in policies issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on 22or after January 1, 2028. All home rule units must comply with 23this Act. This subsection is a denial and limitation of home 24rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of 25Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.   SB3114 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1    Section 15. Prohibition of automatic downcoding.2    (a) A health care payor shall not implement any policy or 3use any algorithm or other automated process, system, or tool 4that bypasses the evaluation of information included by the 5billing health care professional to downcode a claim.6    (b) A health care payor may use an automated process to 7identify claims that may justify a downcoding determination 8following American Medical Association Current Procedural 9Terminology (CPT) coding guidelines in effect at the time of 10service. All downcoding determinations must be made or 11reviewed by a natural person following American Medical 12Association Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) coding 13guidelines in effect at the time, and the health care payor 14must maintain and implement policies and procedures requiring 15a natural person to consider information included by the 16billing health care professional on the claim submission in 17such determination. 18    Section 20. Prohibition on diagnosis-based downcoding. A 19health care payor shall not downcode a claim based solely on 20the reported diagnosis codes. 21    Section 25. Notification requirements for downcoded 22claims. When a claim is downcoded, the health care payor shall 23notify the billing health care professional using the 24appropriate CARCs and RARCs to clearly indicate that the claim   SB3114 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1has been downcoded and provide:2        (1) the specific reason for the downcoding, including 3    reference to the clinical information and coding guidance 4    used to justify the downcoding;5        (2) the original and revised service codes and payment 6    amounts; and7        (3) the process to initiate a dispute for a downcoding 8    decision. 9    Section 30. Dispute process for downcoded claims.10    (a) A health care payor shall provide health care 11professionals with a clear and accessible process for 12disputing downcoded claims, including a written or electronic 13notice detailing how to initiate a dispute, contact 14information for the entity or department managing the dispute, 15reasonable timelines for submission by the billing health care 16professional of a dispute that are no less than 90 days, and 17timelines for adjudication of the dispute consistent with 18applicable State law or regulations governing utilization 19review.20    (b) A health care payor must ensure that all downcoding 21disputes are reviewed by a natural person. The reviewing 22natural person must:23        (1) be knowledgeable of, and have experience 24    providing, the health care services under dispute;25        (2) not have been directly involved in making the   SB3114 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1    decision to downcode the claim;2        (3) perform a document review of the clinical 3    information supporting the billed service, including, but 4    not limited to, a review of all pertinent medical records 5    provided to the health care payor and any medical 6    literature provided to the health care payor from the 7    billing health care professional; and8        (4) follow American Medical Association Current 9    Procedural Terminology (CPT) coding guidelines in effect 10    at the time of service.11    (c) Use of a dispute process for downcoded claims does not 12preclude the health care professional's or enrollee's right to 13appeal any adverse determination under applicable State and 14federal law, rules, or regulations governing utilization 15review. 16    Section 35. Protections for patients with chronic 17conditions. A health care payor shall not use downcoding 18practices in a targeted or discriminatory manner against 19health care professionals who routinely treat patients with 20complex or chronic conditions. 21    Section 40. Administration and enforcement.22    (a) The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 23provisions of this Act pursuant to the enforcement powers 24granted to it by law, including, but not limited to, any powers   SB3114 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1granted to enforce the Illinois Insurance Code. Such 2enforcement shall extend to health care payors' compliance 3with this Act's procedural requirements and restrictions, 4compliance with this Act's standards for personnel and 5automated processes, and any pattern or practice of violating 6Section 20 of this Act. Nothing in this Act shall authorize the 7Department of Insurance to conduct any process under which a 8health care provider may submit an appeal for the purpose of 9receiving a determination from the Department of Insurance 10that is binding on the health care payor and the billing health 11care professional about the correctness of any particular 12downcoding decision under applicable coding guidelines, but 13the Department of Insurance shall have the authority to use 14any of its powers, including, but not limited to, the 15investigation of complaints, to enforce subsection (b) of 16Section 15.17    (b) A health care payor shall be responsible for the 18compliance with this Act by any third party to whom the health 19care payor delegates any functions related to downcoding.20    (c) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 21enforce the provisions of this Act, subject to federal laws, 22rules, regulations, and regulatory guidance, as it applies to 23all Medicaid managed care organizations serving persons 24enrolled under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code or 25under the Children's Health Insurance Program Act.   SB3114 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19668 BAB 33117 b1    Section 500. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 2adding Section 5-5.12g as follows: 3    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.12g new)4    Sec. 5-5.12g. Compliance with the Transparency in 5Downcoding Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to 6the contrary, all managed care organizations shall comply with 7the requirements of the Transparency in Downcoding Act. 8    Section 997. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 9severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 10    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2028.